Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.150

Permissible sales of insignificant residue of shares.

Any insignificant residue of shares not sold in the subscription offering or in a public offering referred to in RCW 32.32.060 may be sold in such other manner as provided in the plan with the director's approval.

[ 1994 c 92 s 360; 1985 c 56 s 20; 1981 c 85 s 29.]